Maryland, session 2025, HB0884.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
21–259.4.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DELIVERY SALE” MEANS A SALE OF DIET PILLS TO A CONSUMER
IN WHICH:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0884*

HOUSE BILL 884
(I) 1. THE CONSUMER SUBMITS THE ORDER FOR THE SALE
BY MEANS OF A TELEPHONE OR OTHER METHOD OF VOICE TRANSMISSION, THE
MAIL, OR THE INTERNET; OR
2. THE SELLER IS OTHERWISE NOT IN THE PHYSICAL
PRESENCE OF THE BUYER WHEN THE REQUEST FOR PURCHASE IS MADE; OR
(II) 1. THE DIET PILLS ARE DELIVERED TO THE BUYER BY
COMMON CARRIER, PRIVATE DELIVERY SERVICE, OR OTHER METHOD OF REMOTE
DELIVERY; OR
2. THE SELLER IS OTHERWISE NOT IN THE PHYSICAL
PRESENCE OF THE BUYER WHEN THE BUYER OBTAINS POSSESSION OF THE DIET
PILLS.
(3) “DELIVERY SELLER” MEANS A PERSON, INCLUDING AN ONLINE
RETAILER, WHO MAKES DELIVERY SALES OF OVER–THE–COUNTER DIET PILLS.
(4) (I) “DIET PILLS” MEANS ONE OF THE FOLLOWING PRODUCTS
THAT IS LABELED, MARKETED, OR OTHERWISE REPRESENTED FOR THE PURPOSE OF
ACHIEVING WEIGHT LOSS OR BUILDING MUSCLE:
1. A DIETARY SUPPLEMENT, AS DEFINED IN 21 U.S.C. §
321; OR
2. A DRUG, AS DEFINED IN 21 U.S.C. § 321 FOR WHICH A
PRESCRIPTION IS NOT REQUIRED UNDER THE FEDERAL FOOD, DRUG, AND
COSMETIC ACT.
(II) “DIET PILLS” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
1. DIETARY FIBER PRODUCTS; OR
2. PROTEIN POWDERS, PROTEIN DRINKS, OR FOODS
MARKETED AS CONTAINING PROTEIN UNLESS THE PROTEIN POWDER, PROTEIN
DRINK, OR FOOD MARKETED AS CONTAINING PROTEIN CONTAINS AN INGREDIENT
OTHER THAN PROTEIN THAT IS A PRODUCT DESCRIBED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH.
(5) “RETAIL ESTABLISHMENT” MEANS ANY VENDOR THAT, IN THE
COURSE OF REGULAR BUSINESS, SELLS DIET PILLS AT RETAIL DIRECTLY TO THE
PUBLIC.

HOUSE BILL 884 3
(B) (1) A PERSON MAY NOT SELL, TRANSFER, OR OTHERWISE FURNISH
DIET PILLS TO AN INDIVIDUAL UNDER THE AGE OF 18 YEARS WITHOUT A
PRESCRIPTION UNLESS THE INDIVIDUAL IS ACCOMPANIED BY A PARENT OR
GUARDIAN.
(2) A RETAIL ESTABLISHMENT THAT SELLS DIET PILLS SHALL LIMIT
ACCESS TO THE DIET PILLS IN AN AREA THAT IS DIRECTLY ACCESSIBLE ONLY BY
EMPLOYEES OF THE RETAIL ESTABLISHMENT, SUCH AS BEHIND A RETAIL COUNTER
OR IN A LOCKED CASE.
(3) A PERSON SHALL REQUEST VALID IDENTIFICATION FROM AN
INDIVIDUAL ATTEMPTING TO PURCHASE DIET PILLS IF THE INDIVIDUAL
REASONABLY APPEARS TO BE UNDER THE AGE OF 18 YEARS.
(C) A DELIVERY SELLER:
(1) MAY NOT SELL, DELIVER, OR CAUSE TO BE DELIVERED ANY DIET
PILLS TO AN INDIVIDUAL UNDER THE AGE OF 18 YEARS;
(2) SHALL SHIP DIET PILLS THROUGH A METHOD OF SHIPPING THAT
REQUIRES:
(I) THE CONSUMER PLACING THE DELIVERY SALE ORDER, OR
AN ADULT WHO IS AT LEAST 18 YEARS OF AGE WHO RESIDES AT THE ADDRESS OF
THE DELIVERY, TO SIGN TO ACCEPT DELIVERY; AND
(II) THE INDIVIDUAL WHO SIGNS THE DELIVERY TO PROVIDE
PROOF, IN THE FORM OF A VALID, GOVERNMENT–ISSUED PHOTOGRAPHIC
IDENTIFICATION, THAT THE INDIVIDUAL IS AT LEAST 18 YEARS OF AGE; AND
(3) SHALL SHIP DIET PILLS IN PACKAGING THAT CLEARLY INDICATES
THAT THE PACKAGE CONTAINS A DIET PILL.
(D) (1) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL
PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $750.
(2) A PENALTY IMPOSED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION AGAINST A RETAIL
ESTABLISHMENT WITH TWO OR MORE LOCATIONS IN THE STATE SHALL BE IMPOSED
AGAINST THE LOCATION AT WHICH THE VIOLATION OCCURRED.
(E) WHEN DETERMINING WHETHER A DRUG OR DIETARY SUPPLEMENT
CONSTITUTES A DIET PILL, A COURT MAY CONSIDER WHETHER:

HOUSE BILL 884
(1) THE DRUG OR DIETARY SUPPLEMENT CONTAINS:
(I) AN INGREDIENT APPROVED BY THE U.S. FOOD AND DRUG
ADMINISTRATION FOR WEIGHT LOSS OR MUSCLE BUILDING;
(II) A STEROID; OR
(III) CREATINE, GREEN TEA EXTRACT, RASPBERRY KETONE,
GARCINIA CAMBOGIA, OR GREEN COFFEE BEAN EXTRACT;
(2) THE LABELING OR MARKETING OF THE DRUG OR DIETARY
SUPPLEMENT INCLUDES STATEMENTS OR IMAGES THAT EXPRESSLY STATE OR
IMPLY THAT THE DRUG OR DIETARY SUPPLEMENT WILL HELP:
(I) MODIFY, MAINTAIN, OR REDUCE BODY FAT, APPETITE,
OVERALL METABOLISM, OR THE PROCESS BY WHICH NUTRIENTS ARE METABOLIZED;
OR
(II) MAINTAIN OR INCREASE MUSCLE OR STRENGTH;
(3) THE DRUG OR DIETARY SUPPLEMENT OR ITS INGREDIENTS ARE
OTHERWISE REPRESENTED FOR THE PURPOSE OF ACHIEVING WEIGHT LOSS OR
BUILDING MUSCLE; OR
(4) THE RETAILER HAS:
(I) PLACED SIGNS, CATEGORIZED, OR TAGGED THE DRUG OR
DIETARY SUPPLEMENT WITH STATEMENTS DESCRIBED IN ITEM (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION;
(II) GROUPED THE DRUG OR DIETARY SUPPLEMENT WITH
OTHER WEIGHT–LOSS OR MUSCLE–BUILDING PRODUCTS IN A DISPLAY,
ADVERTISEMENT, WEBPAGE, OR AREA OF THE STORE; OR
(III) OTHERWISE REPRESENTED THAT THE DRUG OR DIETARY
SUPPLEMENT IS FOR WEIGHT LOSS OR MUSCLE BUILDING.
(F) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO IMPOSE LIABILITY ON NEWS
MEDIA THAT ACCEPT OR PUBLISH ADVERTISING FOR A DIET PILL.
21–1215.

HOUSE BILL 884 5
(a) This section does not apply to a violation of § 21–220(b)(4), § 21–228, [or] §
21–259.3, OR § 21–259.4 of this title.
(b) A person who violates any provision of Subtitle 2 of this title or any regulation
adopted under Subtitle 2 of this title is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject
to:
(1) A fine not exceeding $10,000 or imprisonment not exceeding 1 year or
both; or
(2) If the person has been convicted once of violating Subtitle 2 of this title,
a fine not exceeding $25,000 or imprisonment not exceeding 3 years or both.
(c) In addition to any criminal penalties imposed under this section, a person who
violates any provision of Subtitle 2 of this title, any rule or regulation adopted under
Subtitle 2 of this title, or any term, condition, or limitation of any license or registration
issued under Subtitle 2 of this title:
(1) Is subject to a civil penalty not exceeding $5,000, in an action in any
District Court; and
(2) May be enjoined from continuing the violation.
(d) Each day on which a violation occurs is a separate violation under this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.